Hawaii statutes.
§245-2 License. (a) It shall
be unlawful for any person to engage in the business of a wholesaler or dealer
in the State without having received first a license therefor issued by the
department of taxation under this chapter; provided that this section shall not
be construed to supersede any other law relating to licensing of persons in the
same business.

(b) The license shall be issued by the
department upon application therefor, in such form and manner as shall be
required by rule of the department, and the payment of a fee of $2.50, and
shall be renewable annually on July 1 for the twelve months ending the
succeeding June 30.

(c) The department may suspend or, after
hearing, revoke or decline to renew any license issued under this chapter
whenever the department finds that the applicant or licensee has failed to
comply with this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter, or for any
other good cause. Good cause includes but is not limited to instances where an
applicant or licensee has:

(1) Submitted a false or fraudulent application or
provided a false statement in an application; or

(2) Possessed or displayed a false or fraudulent
license.

Upon suspending or revoking any license, the
department shall request that the licensee immediately surrender the license or
any duplicate issued to the licensee and the licensee shall surrender the
license or duplicate promptly to the department as requested.

(d) Whenever the department suspends, revokes,
or declines to renew a license, the department shall notify the applicant or
licensee immediately and afford the applicant or licensee a hearing, if
requested and if a hearing has not already been afforded. After the hearing,
the department shall:

(1) Rescind its order of suspension;

(2) Continue the suspension;

(3) Revoke the license;

(4) Rescind its order of revocation;

(5) Decline to renew the license; or

(6) Renew the license. [L 1939, c 220, §3; RL 1945,
§5752; RL 1955, §125-2; am L Sp 1957, c 1, §8(a); am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §16;
HRS §245-2; am L 1993, c 220, §8; am L 1995, c 92, §17; am L 2005, c 131, §§3,
9(2); am L 2009, c 30, §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next